Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE. 1 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 2 to the department of justice for the fiscal year beginning July 3 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or 4 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 5 designated: 6 a. For the general office of attorney general for 7 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, 8 including the prosecuting attorneys training program, matching 9 funds for federal violence against women grant programs, 10 victim assistance grants, the office of drug control policy 11 prosecuting attorney program, and odometer fraud enforcement: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,672,266 13 As a condition of receiving the appropriation provided 14 in this lettered paragraph, the department of justice shall 15 maintain a record of the estimated time incurred representing 16 each agency or department. 17 The general office of attorney general may temporarily 18 exceed and draw more than the amount appropriated in this 19 lettered paragraph and incur a negative cash balance as long 20 as there are receivables equal to or greater than the negative 21 balances and the amount appropriated in this lettered paragraph 22 is not exceeded at the close of the fiscal year. 23 b. For victim assistance grants: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,166,708 25 Of the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, 26 $150,000 is allocated to provide grants to care providers 27 providing services to victims of human trafficking. The 28 remaining moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 29 are allocated to provide grants to care providers providing 30 services to all other victims of violent crime. 31 The balance of the victim compensation fund established in 32 section 915.94 may be used to provide salary and support of not 33 more than 24.00 full-time equivalent positions and to provide 34 maintenance for the victim compensation functions of the 35 -1- LSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns 1/ 18 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ department of justice. In addition to the full-time equivalent 1 positions authorized pursuant to this unnumbered paragraph, 2 7.00 full-time equivalent positions are authorized and shall be 3 used by the department of justice to employ one accountant and 4 four program planners. The department of justice may employ 5 the additional 7.00 full-time equivalent positions authorized 6 pursuant to this unnumbered paragraph that are in excess of the 7 number of full-time equivalent positions authorized only if 8 the department of justice receives sufficient federal moneys 9 to maintain employment for the additional full-time equivalent 10 positions during the current fiscal year. The department 11 of justice shall only employ the additional 7.00 full-time 12 equivalent positions in succeeding fiscal years if sufficient 13 federal moneys are received during each of those succeeding 14 fiscal years. 15 The department of justice shall transfer at least $150,000 16 from the victim compensation fund established in section 915.94 17 to the victim assistance grant program established in section 18 13.31. 19 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 20 lettered paragraph that remain unencumbered or unobligated at 21 the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 22 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 23 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 24 c. For legal services for persons in poverty grants as 25 provided in section 13.34: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,634,601 27 d. To improve the department of justiceâs cybersecurity and 28 technology infrastructure: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 202,060 30 2. a. The department of justice, in submitting budget 31 estimates for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, pursuant 32 to section 8.23, shall include a report of funding from sources 33 other than amounts appropriated directly from the general fund 34 of the state to the department of justice or to the office of 35 -2- LSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns 2/ 18 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ consumer advocate. These funding sources must include but 1 are not limited to reimbursements from other state agencies, 2 commissions, boards, or similar entities, and reimbursements 3 from special funds or internal accounts within the department 4 of justice. The department of justice shall also report actual 5 reimbursements for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, 6 and actual and expected reimbursements for the fiscal year 7 beginning July 1, 2026. 8 b. The department of justice shall include the report 9 required under paragraph âaâ, as well as information regarding 10 any revisions occurring as a result of reimbursements actually 11 received or expected at a later date, in a report to the 12 general assembly. The department of justice shall submit the 13 report on or before January 15, 2027. 14 3. a. The department of justice shall fully reimburse 15 the costs and necessary related expenses incurred by the Iowa 16 law enforcement academy to continue to employ one additional 17 instructor position who shall provide training for human 18 trafficking-related issues throughout the state. 19 b. The department of justice shall obtain the moneys 20 necessary to reimburse the Iowa law enforcement academy to 21 employ such an instructor from unrestricted moneys from either 22 the victim compensation fund established in section 915.94 or 23 the human trafficking victim fund established in section 915.95 24 or the human trafficking enforcement fund established in 2015 25 Iowa Acts, chapter 138, section 141. 26 4. Notwithstanding sections 553.19 and 714.16C, for the 27 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 28 any moneys not otherwise appropriated from the antitrust fund 29 created in section 553.19 and the consumer education and 30 litigation fund created in section 714.16C are appropriated to 31 the department of justice for salaries, support, maintenance, 32 and miscellaneous purposes necessary to perform the duties 33 described in section 13.2. 34 Sec. 2. OFFICE OF CONSUMER ADVOCATE. There is appropriated 35 -3- LSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns 3/ 18 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ from the commerce revolving fund created in section 546.12 to 1 the office of consumer advocate of the department of justice 2 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 3 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 4 to be used for the purposes designated: 5 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 6 purposes: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,784,047 8 The office of consumer advocate shall include in its charges 9 assessed or revenues generated an amount sufficient to cover 10 the amount stated in its appropriation and any state-assessed 11 indirect costs determined by the department of administrative 12 services. 13 Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ FACILITIES. 14 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 15 to the department of corrections for the fiscal year beginning 16 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, 17 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 18 designated: 19 a. For the operation of the Fort Madison correctional 20 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 21 miscellaneous purposes: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 46,724,722 23 b. For the operation of the Anamosa correctional facility, 24 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 25 purposes: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 40,255,974 27 c. For the operation of the Oakdale correctional facility, 28 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 29 purposes: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 59,344,020 31 d. For the Oakdale correctional facility for 32 department-wide institutional pharmaceuticals and miscellaneous 33 purposes: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,175,417 35 -4- LSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns 4/ 18 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ e. For the operation of the Newton correctional facility, 1 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 2 purposes: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 32,509,092 4 f. For the operation of the Mount Pleasant correctional 5 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 6 miscellaneous purposes: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 30,619,297 8 g. For the operation of the Rockwell City correctional 9 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 10 miscellaneous purposes: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,916,579 12 h. For the operation of the Clarinda correctional facility, 13 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 14 purposes: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 29,678,380 16 i. For the operation of the Mitchellville correctional 17 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 18 miscellaneous purposes: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 26,350,539 20 j. For the operation of the Fort Dodge correctional 21 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 22 miscellaneous purposes: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 34,467,251 24 k. For reimbursement of counties for temporary confinement 25 of prisoners, as provided in sections 901.7, 904.908, and 26 906.17, and for offenders confined pursuant to section 904.513: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,345,319 28 l. For federal prison reimbursement, reimbursements for 29 out-of-state placements, and miscellaneous contracts: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 234,411 31 2. The department of corrections shall use moneys 32 appropriated in subsection 1 to continue to contract for the 33 services of a Muslim imam and a Native American spiritual 34 leader. 35 -5- LSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns 5/ 18 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Sec. 4. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ ADMINISTRATION. There 1 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 2 department of corrections for the fiscal year beginning July 3 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or 4 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 5 designated: 6 1. For general administration, including salaries and the 7 adjustment of salaries throughout the department, support, 8 maintenance, employment of an education director to administer 9 a centralized education program for the correctional system, 10 and miscellaneous purposes: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 9,650,695 12 a. It is the intent of the general assembly that each 13 lease negotiated by the department of corrections with a 14 private corporation for the purpose of providing private 15 industry employment of inmates in a correctional institution 16 shall prohibit the private corporation from utilizing inmate 17 labor for partisan political purposes for any person seeking 18 election to public office in this state and that a violation 19 of this requirement shall result in a termination of the lease 20 agreement. 21 b. It is the intent of the general assembly that as a 22 condition of receiving the appropriation provided in this 23 subsection the department of corrections shall not enter into 24 a lease or contractual agreement pursuant to section 904.809 25 with a private corporation for the use of building space for 26 the purpose of providing inmate employment without providing 27 that the terms of the lease or contract establish safeguards to 28 restrict, to the greatest extent feasible, access by inmates 29 working for the private corporation to personal identifying 30 information of citizens. 31 2. For educational programs for inmates at state penal 32 institutions: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,108,109 34 a. To maximize the funding for educational programs, 35 -6- LSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns 6/ 18 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ the department shall establish guidelines and procedures to 1 prioritize the availability of educational and vocational 2 training for inmates based upon the goal of facilitating an 3 inmateâs successful release from the correctional institution. 4 b. The director of the department of corrections may 5 transfer moneys from Iowa prison industries and the canteen 6 operating funds established pursuant to section 904.310, for 7 use in educational programs for inmates. 8 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 9 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 10 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 11 available for expenditure for the purposes designated in this 12 subsection until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 13 3. For the development and operation of the Iowa corrections 14 offender network (ICON) data system: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 16 4. For offender mental health and substance abuse 17 treatment: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 28,065 19 5. For department-wide duties, including operations, costs, 20 and miscellaneous purposes: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,500,000 22 Sec. 5. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ JUDICIAL DISTRICT 23 DEPARTMENTS OF CORRECTIONAL SERVICES. 24 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 25 to the department of corrections for the fiscal year beginning 26 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, 27 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for salaries, 28 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 29 a. For the first judicial district department of 30 correctional services: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,395,981 32 It is the intent of the general assembly that the first 33 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 34 the drug courts operated by the district department. 35 -7- LSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns 7/ 18 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ b. For the second judicial district department of 1 correctional services: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 14,105,725 3 It is the intent of the general assembly that the second 4 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 5 two drug courts to be operated by the district department. 6 c. For the third judicial district department of 7 correctional services: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,915,376 9 d. For the fourth judicial district department of 10 correctional services: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,563,898 12 e. For the fifth judicial district department of 13 correctional services, including funding for electronic 14 monitoring devices for use on a statewide basis: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25,194,813 16 It is the intent of the general assembly that the fifth 17 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 18 the drug court operated by the district department. 19 f. For the sixth judicial district department of 20 correctional services: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,554,811 22 It is the intent of the general assembly that the sixth 23 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 24 the drug court operated by the district department. 25 g. For the seventh judicial district department of 26 correctional services: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,003,457 28 It is the intent of the general assembly that the seventh 29 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 30 the drug court operated by the district department. 31 h. For the eighth judicial district department of 32 correctional services: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,259,926 34 2. Each judicial district department of correctional 35 -8- LSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns 8/ 18 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ services, within the moneys available, shall continue programs 1 and plans established within that district to provide for 2 intensive supervision, sex offender treatment, diversion of 3 low-risk offenders to the least restrictive sanction available, 4 job development, and expanded use of intermediate criminal 5 sanctions. 6 3. Each judicial district department of correctional 7 services shall provide alternatives to prison consistent with 8 chapter 901B. The alternatives to prison must ensure public 9 safety while providing maximum rehabilitation to the offender. 10 A judicial district department of correctional services may 11 also establish a day program. 12 4. The office of drug control policy of the department 13 of public safety shall consider federal grants made to the 14 department of corrections for the benefit of each of the eight 15 judicial district departments of correctional services as local 16 government grants, as defined pursuant to federal regulations. 17 5. The department of corrections shall continue to contract 18 with a judicial district department of correctional services 19 to provide for the rental of electronic monitoring equipment 20 available statewide. 21 6. The public safety assessment shall not be utilized in 22 pretrial hearings when determining whether to detain or release 23 a defendant before trial until such time the use of the public 24 safety assessment has been specifically authorized by the 25 general assembly. 26 Sec. 6. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ REALLOCATION OF 27 APPROPRIATIONS. Notwithstanding section 8.39, within 28 the moneys appropriated in this Act to the department of 29 corrections, the department may reallocate the moneys 30 appropriated and allocated as necessary to best fulfill the 31 needs of the correctional institutions, administration of 32 the department, and the judicial district departments of 33 correctional services. However, in addition to complying with 34 the requirements of section 904.116 and providing notice to 35 -9- LSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns 9/ 18 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ the legislative services agency, the department of corrections 1 shall also provide notice to the department of management, 2 prior to the effective date of the revision or reallocation of 3 an appropriation made pursuant to this section. The department 4 of corrections shall not reallocate an appropriation or 5 allocation for the purpose of eliminating any program. 6 Sec. 7. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ INTENT ââ REPORTS. 7 1. The department of corrections, in cooperation with 8 townships, the Iowa cemetery associations, and other nonprofit 9 or governmental entities, may use inmate labor during the 10 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, to restore or preserve 11 rural cemeteries and historical landmarks. The department, in 12 cooperation with the counties, may also use inmate labor to 13 clean up roads, major water sources, and other water sources 14 around the state. 15 2. By January 15, 2027, the department shall provide an 16 annual status report regarding private-sector employment to 17 the general assembly. The report must include the number 18 of offenders employed in the private sector, the combined 19 number of hours worked by the offenders, the total amount of 20 allowances, and the distribution of allowances pursuant to 21 section 904.702, including any moneys deposited in the general 22 fund of the state. 23 Sec. 8. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ ELECTRONIC MONITORING 24 REPORT. The department of corrections shall submit a report 25 on electronic monitoring to the general assembly by January 26 15, 2027. The report must specifically address the number 27 of persons being electronically monitored and break down the 28 number of persons being electronically monitored by offense 29 committed. The report must also include a comparison of any 30 data from the prior fiscal year with the current fiscal year. 31 Sec. 9. STATE AGENCY PURCHASES FROM PRISON INDUSTRIES. 32 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 33 requires, âstate agencyâ means the government of the state 34 of Iowa, including but not limited to all executive branch 35 -10- LSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns 10/ 18 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ departments, agencies, boards, bureaus, and commissions, the 1 judicial branch, the general assembly and all legislative 2 agencies, institutions within the purview of the state board of 3 regents, and any corporation whose primary function is to act 4 as an instrumentality of the state. 5 2. State agencies are encouraged to purchase products from 6 Iowa state industries, as defined in section 904.802, when 7 purchases are required and the products are available from 8 Iowa state industries. State agencies shall obtain bids from 9 Iowa state industries for purchases of office furniture during 10 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, exceeding $5,000 or 11 in accordance with applicable administrative rules related to 12 purchases for the agency. 13 Sec. 10. IOWA LAW ENFORCEMENT ACADEMY. 14 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 15 state to the Iowa law enforcement academy for the fiscal year 16 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 17 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 18 purposes designated: 19 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 20 purposes, including jailer training and technical assistance: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,919,407 22 b. The Iowa law enforcement academy may temporarily exceed 23 and draw more than the amount appropriated in this subsection 24 and incur a negative cash balance as long as there are 25 receivables equal to or greater than the negative balance and 26 the amount appropriated in this subsection is not exceeded at 27 the close of the fiscal year. 28 2. The Iowa law enforcement academy may select at least 29 five automobiles of the department of public safety, division 30 of state patrol, prior to turning over the automobiles to 31 the department of administrative services to be disposed 32 of by public auction, and the Iowa law enforcement academy 33 may exchange any automobile owned by the academy for each 34 automobile selected if the selected automobile is used in 35 -11- LSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns 11/ 18 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ training law enforcement officers at the academy. However, any 1 automobile exchanged by the academy must be substituted for 2 the selected vehicle of the department of public safety and 3 sold by public auction with the receipts being deposited in the 4 depreciation fund maintained pursuant to section 8A.365 to the 5 credit of the department of public safety, division of state 6 patrol. 7 3. The Iowa law enforcement academy shall provide training 8 for domestic abuse and human trafficking-related issues 9 throughout the state. The academy shall offer the training at 10 no cost to the attendees and the training shall not replace any 11 existing domestic abuse or human trafficking training offered 12 by the academy. 13 Sec. 11. STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER. 14 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 15 to the office of the state public defender of the department 16 of inspections, appeals, and licensing for the fiscal year 17 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 18 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 19 purposes designated: 20 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 21 purposes: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 38,627,894 23 b. For payments on behalf of eligible adults and juveniles 24 from the indigent defense fund, in accordance with section 25 815.11: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 41,226,374 27 2. Moneys received by the office of the state public 28 defender pursuant to Tit. IV-E of the federal Social Security 29 Act remaining unencumbered and unobligated at the end of the 30 fiscal year shall not revert but shall be transferred to the 31 Tit. IV-E juvenile justice improvement fund created in 2022 32 Iowa Acts, chapter 1146, section 11, subsection 3, to remain 33 available for expenditure by the office of the state public 34 defender in succeeding fiscal years for the purposes allowed by 35 -12- LSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns 12/ 18 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Tit. IV-E of the federal Social Security Act. 1 Sec. 12. BOARD OF PAROLE. There is appropriated from the 2 general fund of the state to the board of parole for the fiscal 3 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 4 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 5 used for the purposes designated: 6 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 7 purposes: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,545,114 9 Sec. 13. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC DEFENSE. 10 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 11 state to the department of public defense, for the fiscal year 12 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 13 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 14 purposes designated: 15 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 16 purposes: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,646,037 18 2. The department of public defense may temporarily exceed 19 and draw more than the amount appropriated in this section and 20 incur a negative cash balance as long as there are receivables 21 of federal funds equal to or greater than the negative balance 22 and the amount appropriated in this section is not exceeded at 23 the close of the fiscal year. 24 Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY 25 MANAGEMENT. 26 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 27 to the department of homeland security and emergency management 28 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 29 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 30 to be used for the purposes designated: 31 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 32 purposes: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,396,138 34 2. The department of homeland security and emergency 35 -13- LSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns 13/ 18 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ management may temporarily exceed and draw more than the amount 1 appropriated in this section and incur a negative cash balance 2 as long as there are receivables of federal funds equal to or 3 greater than the negative balance and the amount appropriated 4 in this section is not exceeded at the close of the fiscal 5 year. 6 Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY. There is appropriated 7 from the general fund of the state to the department of public 8 safety for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 9 June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 10 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 11 1. For administrative functions, including salaries and 12 the adjustment of salaries throughout the department, and the 13 criminal justice information system: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,325,444 15 2. For the division of criminal investigation, including 16 the stateâs contribution to the peace officersâ retirement, 17 accident, and disability system provided in chapter 97A in the 18 amount of the stateâs normal contribution rate, as defined in 19 section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries for which the moneys 20 are appropriated, to meet federal fund matching requirements: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,282,804 22 3. For the criminalistics laboratory fund created in 23 section 691.9: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 650,000 25 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 26 subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close 27 of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 28 for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 29 the succeeding fiscal year. 30 4. a. For the division of narcotics enforcement, including 31 the stateâs contribution to the peace officersâ retirement, 32 accident, and disability system provided in chapter 97A in the 33 amount of the stateâs normal contribution rate, as defined in 34 section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries for which the moneys 35 -14- LSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns 14/ 18 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ are appropriated, to meet federal fund matching requirements: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,496,573 2 b. For the division of narcotics enforcement for undercover 3 purchases: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 209,042 5 5. For the division of state fire marshal, for fire 6 protection services as provided through the state fire service 7 and emergency response council as created in the department, 8 and for the stateâs contribution to the peace officersâ 9 retirement, accident, and disability system provided in chapter 10 97A in the amount of the stateâs normal contribution rate, as 11 defined in section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries for which 12 the moneys are appropriated: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,635,378 14 6. For the division of state patrol, for salaries, support, 15 maintenance, workersâ compensation costs, and miscellaneous 16 purposes, including the stateâs contribution to the peace 17 officersâ retirement, accident, and disability system provided 18 in chapter 97A in the amount of the stateâs normal contribution 19 rate, as defined in section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries 20 for which the moneys are appropriated: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 94,251,941 22 It is the intent of the general assembly that members of the 23 state patrol be assigned to patrol the highways and roads in 24 lieu of assignments for inspecting school buses for the school 25 districts. 26 7. For deposit in the sick leave benefits fund established 27 in section 80.42 for all departmental employees eligible to 28 receive benefits for accrued sick leave under the collective 29 bargaining agreement: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 279,517 31 8. For costs associated with the training and equipment 32 needs of volunteer fire fighters: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,075,520 34 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 35 -15- LSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns 15/ 18 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close 1 of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 2 for expenditure for the purposes designated in this subsection 3 until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 4 9. For the public safety interoperable and broadband 5 communications fund established in section 80.44: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 115,661 7 10. For the office to combat human trafficking established 8 in section 80.45, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 9 miscellaneous purposes: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,742 11 11. For department-wide duties, including operations, 12 costs, and miscellaneous purposes: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,430,000 14 12. For the office of drug control policy, for salaries, 15 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, including 16 statewide coordination of the drug abuse resistance education 17 (D.A.R.E.) programs or other similar programs: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 270,546 19 Notwithstanding section 8.39, the department of public 20 safety may reallocate moneys appropriated in this section 21 as necessary to best fulfill the needs provided for in the 22 appropriation. However, the department shall not reallocate 23 moneys appropriated to the department in this section unless 24 notice of the reallocation is given to the legislative services 25 agency and the department of management prior to the effective 26 date of the reallocation. The notice must include information 27 regarding the rationale for reallocating the moneys. The 28 department shall not reallocate moneys appropriated in this 29 section for the purpose of eliminating any program. 30 Sec. 16. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY ââ GAMING ENFORCEMENT. 31 1. There is appropriated from the gaming enforcement 32 revolving fund created in section 80.43 to the department of 33 public safety for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 34 ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof 35 -16- LSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns 16/ 18 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1 For any direct support costs for agents and officers of 2 the division of criminal investigationâs excursion gambling 3 boat, gambling structure, and racetrack enclosure enforcement 4 activities, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 5 miscellaneous purposes: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 13,084,081 7 2. For each additional license to conduct gambling games on 8 an excursion gambling boat, gambling structure, or racetrack 9 enclosure issued during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, 10 there is appropriated from the gaming enforcement revolving 11 fund to the department of public safety for the fiscal year 12 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, an additional 13 amount of not more than $300,000 to be used for full-time 14 equivalent positions. 15 3. The department of public safety, with the approval of the 16 department of management, may employ no more than three special 17 agents for each additional riverboat or gambling structure 18 regulated after July 1, 2026, and three special agents for 19 each racing facility which becomes operational during the 20 fiscal year which begins July 1, 2026. Positions authorized 21 in this subsection are in addition to the full-time equivalent 22 positions otherwise authorized in this section. 23 Sec. 17. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY 24 MANAGEMENT. There is appropriated from the 911 emergency 25 communications fund created in section 34A.7A to the department 26 of homeland security and emergency management for the fiscal 27 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 28 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 29 used for the purposes designated: 30 For implementation, support, and maintenance of the 31 functions of the administrator and program manager under 32 chapter 34A and to employ the auditor of the state to perform 33 an annual audit of the 911 emergency communications fund: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 35 -17- LSB 5014XG (3) 91 as/ns 17/ 18 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Sec. 18. DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE ââ CONSUMER EDUCATION AND 1 LITIGATION ââ FARM MEDIATION AND PROSECUTIONS, APPEALS, AND 2 CLAIMS. Notwithstanding section 714.16C, there is appropriated 3 from the consumer education and litigation fund to the 4 department of justice for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 5 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so 6 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 7 designated: 8 1. For farm mediation services as specified in section 9 13.13, subsection 2: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 11 2. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 12 purposes for criminal prosecutions, criminal appeals, and 13 performing duties pursuant to chapter 669: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 15